Florida, session 2026, HB1057.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (h) of subsection (1) of section
429.41, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
429.41 Rules establishing standards.—
(1) It is the intent of the Legislature that rules
published and enforced pursuant to this section shall include
criteria by which a reasonable and consistent quality of
resident care and quality of life may be ensured and the results
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1057-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1057 2026
of such resident care may be demonstrated. Such rules shall also
promote a safe and sanitary environment that is residential and
noninstitutional in design or nature and may allow for
technological advances in the provision of care, safety, and
security, including the use of devices, equipment, and other
security measures related to wander management, emergency
response, staff risk management, and the general safety and
security of residents, staff, and the facility. It is further
intended that reasonable efforts be made to accommodate the
needs and preferences of residents to enhance the quality of
life in a facility. The agency, in consultation with the
Department of Children and Families and the Department of
Health, shall adopt rules to administer this part, which must
include reasonable and fair minimum standards in relation to:
(h) Facilities holding a limited nursing, extended
congregate care, or limited mental health license. Rules adopted
to implement this paragraph related to staffing of a limited
nursing services licensee may not set a minimum staffing
requirement for the provision of limited nursing services to
limited nursing residents if the facility does not have persons
in residence who meet the admission criteria established by the
agency for assisted living facilities under s. 429.07(3)(c)3.
and agency rule.
Section 2. Subsection (3) of section 429.23, Florida
Statutes, is amended, to read:
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1057-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1057 2026
429.23 Internal risk management and quality assurance
program; adverse incidents and reporting requirements.—
(3) Licensed facilities shall provide within 5 1 business
days day after the occurrence of an adverse incident, through
the agency's online portal, or if the portal is offline, by
electronic mail, a preliminary report to the agency on all
adverse incidents specified under this section. The report must
include information regarding the identity of the affected
resident, the type of adverse incident, and the status of the
facility's investigation of the incident.
Section 3. Paragraphs (h) and (i) are added to subsection
(3) of section 429.256, Florida Statutes, to read:
429.256 Assistance with self-administration of medication
and with other tasks.—
(3) Assistance with self-administration of medication
includes:
(h) Dialing an insulin pen prefilled by the manufacturer.
(i) Attaching a new needle to an insulin pen prefilled by
the manufacturer.
Section 4. Paragraphs (a) of subsection (1) of section
429.55, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
429.55 Consumer information.—
(1) CONSUMER INFORMATION WEBSITE.—The Legislature finds
that consumers need additional information on the quality of
care and service in assisted living facilities in order to
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1057-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1057 2026
select the best facility for themselves or their loved ones.
Therefore, the Agency for Health Care Administration shall
create content that is easily accessible through the home page
of the agency's website either directly or indirectly through
links to one or more other established websites of the agency's
choosing. The website must be searchable by facility name,
license type, city, or zip code. By November 1, 2015, the agency
shall include all content in its possession on the website and
add content when received from facilities. At a minimum, the
content must include:
(a) Information on each licensed assisted living facility,
including, but not limited to:
1. The name and address of the facility.
2. The name of the owner or operator of the facility.
3. The number and type of licensed beds in the facility.
4. The types of licenses held by the facility.
5. The facility's license expiration date and status.
6. The total number of clients that the facility is
licensed to serve and the most recently available occupancy
levels.
7. The number of private and semiprivate rooms offered.
8. The bed-hold policy.
9. The religious affiliation, if any, of the assisted
living facility.
100 10. The languages spoken by the staff.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1057-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1057 2026
101 11. Availability of nurses.
102 12. Forms of payment accepted, including, but not limited
103 to, Medicaid, Medicaid long-term managed care, private
104 insurance, health maintenance organization, United States
105 Department of Veterans Affairs, CHAMPUS program, or workers'
106 compensation coverage.
107 13. Indication if the licensee is operating under
108 bankruptcy protection.
109 14. Recreational and other programs available.
110 15. Special care units or programs offered.
111 16. Whether the facility is a part of a retirement
112 community that offers other services pursuant to this part or
113 part III of this chapter, part II or part III of chapter 400, or
114 chapter 651.
115 17. Links to the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program
116 website and the program's statewide toll-free telephone number.
117 18. Links to the websites of the providers.
118 19. Other relevant information that the agency currently
119 collects.
120
121 The agency may adopt rules to administer this section.
122 Section 5. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1057-01-c1